Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Alaska Marine Highway System Fund and Budget.

Sec. 19.65.050.
Legislative findings, purpose, and intent.

The legislature finds that

the Alaska marine highway system is an essential part of the state transportation system, and that it warrants continued and predictable state support;

many communities’ economies are dependent on a steady and stable marine highway system service level;

the state’s tourism industry is greatly enhanced by a dependable marine highway transportation network; and

efficient and prudent management of the system will benefit the state’s economy and foster economic development.

It is the purpose of AS

19.65.050

—

19.65.100

to

enable the Alaska marine highway system to manage and operate in a manner that will enhance performance and accountability by allowing the system to account for and spend its generated revenue;

provide the management tools necessary to efficiently operate the Alaska marine highway system;

within constitutional constraints, provide for a predictable funding base for system operations; and

provide for predictability and stability in the service level furnished to communities served by the system.

It is the intent of AS

19.65.050

—

19.65.100

to

encourage prudent administration through cost management and accurate budgeting by managers of the Alaska marine highway system;

increase revenue from the operation of the system consistent with the public interest, increase service consistent with sound fiscal policy, and assist the prudent management and operation of the system; and

achieve stability in the level of service communities can anticipate through accurate planning and scheduling.

History.

(§ 1 ch 193 SLA 1990)

Sec. 19.65.060.
Alaska marine highway system fund.

There is created, as a special account in the general fund, the Alaska marine highway system fund, into which shall be deposited

the gross revenue of the Alaska marine highway system;

money that is appropriated to the Alaska marine highway system fund by the legislature in an amount that is consistent from year to year and is the amount necessary, after consideration of gross revenue, to provide stable services to the public consistent with the provisions of AS

19.65.050(b)(4)

, which appropriations are not one-year appropriations and the balances of which do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

; and

any other money that is appropriated to the Alaska marine highway system fund by the legislature, which appropriations are not one-year appropriations and the balances of which do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

.

Nothing in this chapter exempts money deposited into the Alaska marine highway system fund from the requirements of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act) or dedicates that money for a specific purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 193 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For vessel replacement fund, see AS

37.05.550

.

Sec. 19.65.070.
Revenue accounting.

The Alaska marine highway system shall account for and remit to the Department of Revenue in accordance with AS

37.10.050

all gross revenue generated from the operation of the Alaska marine highway system during each annual operating cycle. The money shall then be deposited in the Alaska marine highway system fund.

The Alaska marine highway system shall prepare a written report, no later than the 10th day of each regular legislative session, regarding the previous annual operating cycle and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must identify

gross revenue generated during the previous annual operating cycle;

gross revenue generated during the current annual operating cycle and an estimate of gross revenue for the remainder of the current annual operating cycle;

projections of the gross revenue to be generated during the next annual operating cycle; and

the difference between previous gross revenue estimates prepared under this section and the revenues actually generated.

The Department of Revenue shall prepare a written report, no later than the 10th legislative day of each regular legislative session, regarding the earnings on gross revenue of the Alaska marine highway system that was deposited into the Alaska marine highway system fund during the prior fiscal year and projected earnings on gross revenue of the Alaska marine highway system that is projected to be deposited into the Alaska marine highway system fund for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. The Department of Revenue shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 193 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1992; am §§ 39, 40 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 19.65.080.
Annual appropriation.

Commencing with appropriations for the fiscal year that begins July 1, 1991, on an annual basis and under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), the legislature may appropriate amounts from the Alaska marine highway system fund to the Alaska marine highway system.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may request the legislature to appropriate money from the Alaska marine highway system fund to the marine highway system for capital improvements, if

the appropriation under (a) of this section has been made;

the amount in the fund, without regard to the appropriation under (a) of this section, exceeds the total of gross revenue deposited in the fund and the general fund appropriations under AS

19.65.060(a)(2)

by 10 percent; and

the amount requested for appropriation under this subsection does not exceed 50 percent of the balance remaining after the appropriation for annual management and operations is made under (a) of this section.

The unexpended and unobligated balance of money appropriated from the Alaska marine highway system fund lapses into the Alaska marine highway system fund at the end of the fiscal year for which it was appropriated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 193 SLA 1990)

Sec. 19.65.100.
Definitions.

In AS

19.65.050

—

19.65.100

,

“annual operating cycle” means the annual state fiscal year beginning on July 1 and ending at midnight on the following June 30;

“gross revenue” means all money, except money refunded to ticket holders and others for unused services, that is generated from the operation of the Alaska marine highway system, including that derived from vessel operations and uses of Alaska marine highway system facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 193 SLA 1990)